Montana, session 2025, HB939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Required setback for wind turbine generators. After [the effective date of this act], a
wind turbine generator built pursuant to a wind energy agreement as described in 70-17-406 may not be
constructed if the wind turbine tower is 500 feet or more in height, as measured from the natural ground level at
the base of the tower to the tip of the turbine rotor blade, and if the base of the tower is located at a distance of
less than 1,500 1,500 feet from an occupied residence that is subject to a wind energy agreement as described
in 70-17-406 with the owner of the wind turbine generator, unless the a shorter setback distance is approved by
the owner of the real property.
Section 2. Wind turbine generator deicing -- requirement. A After [the effective date of this act], a
wind turbine generator constructed after [the effective date of this act] that is shall use commercially reasonable
efforts to mitigate icing risks during an operator-controlled turbine rotor blade deicing process if the wind turbine
generator is:
(1) 500 feet or more in height, as measured from the natural ground level at the base of the tower
to the tip of the turbine rotor blade, ;
(2) constructed within an area with an ice class rating of 4 or more, as defined in international
energy agency guidelines published in February 2017; and
(3) is located within a distance of 2,500 1,500 feet from an occupied residence. in accordance
with [section 1] may not exceed 10% of the maximum turbine rotor blade speed during the turbine rotor blade
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 939
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 939
deicing process, unless the rotor blade speed is approved by the owner of the real property
"70-17-406. Wind energy agreement -- contents and requirements -- notarization -- fee. (1) A
wind energy agreement executed after April 21, 2011, must contain but is not limited to:
(a) the names and addresses of the parties to the wind energy agreement;
(b) a legal description of the real property subject to the wind easement and contained in the wind
energy agreement;
(c) the obligations of the owner of the real property to ensure the undisturbed flow of wind on and
over the real property, including restrictions placed upon vegetation, structures, and other objects that would
impair or obstruct the wind flow on and over the real property. Structures do not include equipment necessary
to access minerals as they relate to the rights belonging to or the dominance of the mineral estate pursuant to
70-17-408.
(d) a specified term including the date on which the wind energy agreement or wind easement
terminates;
(e) provisions to compensate the owner of the real property for the wind easement;
(f) provisions ensuring that the owner of the real property is not liable for any property tax
associated with the wind energy project or other equipment related to the development of the wind energy
project during the term of the wind energy agreement;
(g) provisions addressing property owner and wind energy developer liability during the
construction and operation of the wind energy project and equipment;
(h) provisions obligating the wind energy developer to comply with federal, state, and local laws
and regulations; and
(i) conditions upon which the wind energy agreement may be terminated prior to its termination
date.
(2) A wind energy agreement must be notarized.
(3) If the terms of the wind energy agreement do not contain the requirements listed in subsection
(1), a court may void the wind energy agreement or order any relief allowed by law. "
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified as an integral
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 939
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 939
part of Title 75, chapter 26, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 26, apply to [sections 1 and 2].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 939
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 939, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 939
INTRODUCED BY K. ZOLNIKOV, B. LER, G. PARRY
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR SETBACKS FOR WIND TURBINE GENERATORS; ESTABLISHING A WIND
TURBINE GENERATOR DEICING STANDARD; AMENDING SECTION 70-17-406, MCA ; AND PROVIDING A
DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE.”